Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 30. Titles and Interests

38-30-101.
Parties entitled to hold lands may convey.

Any person, association of persons, or body politic or corporate which is entitled to hold real estate, or any interest in real estate whatever, shall be authorized to convey the same to another or a body corporate or politic by deed.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 106, § 1.

G.L.

§ 160.

G.S.

§ 198.

R.S. 08:

§ 668.

C.L.

§ 4869.

CSA:

C. 40, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-1.

38-30-102.
Water rights conveyed as real estate - well permit transfers - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly:

Finds that the division of water resources in the department of natural resources needs timely and accurate data regarding well ownership in order to efficiently and accurately account for wells and to ensure that wells are properly constructed and maintained;

Determines that current data concerning well ownership is inadequate and that a substantial number of residential real estate transactions that transfer ownership of a well are not reported to the division;

Determines that current and accurate data is necessary for the state to notify well owners of any health, safety, water right, or stewardship issues pertaining to their groundwater well; and

Declares that this section is intended to provide the division with the information it needs to properly carry out its statutory duties.

In the conveyance of water rights in all cases, except where the ownership of stock in ditch companies or other companies constitutes the ownership of a water right, the same formalities shall be observed and complied with as in the conveyance of real estate.

As used in this subsection (3):

“Closing service” means closing and settlement services, as defined in section 10-11-102, C.R.S.

“Division” means the division of water resources in the department of natural resources.

“Person” means any individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, limited liability company, partnership, association, or other legal entity.

On and after January 1, 2009, when a buyer of residential real estate enters into a transaction that results in the transfer of ownership of a small capacity well listed in section 37-90-105 (1)(a) or (1)(b), C.R.S., or a domestic exempt water well used for ordinary household purposes that is listed in section 37-92-602 (1)(b) or (1)(e), C.R.S., the buyer shall, prior to or at closing of the transaction, complete a change in ownership form for the well in compliance with section 37-90-143, C.R.S.; except that, if an existing well has not yet been registered with the division, the buyer shall complete a registration of existing well form for the well.

The residential real estate contract approved by the real estate commission created in section 12-10-206 shall require the buyer to complete the appropriate form for the well and, if no person will be providing a closing service in connection with the transaction, to file the form with the division within sixty days after closing.

If a person provides a closing service in connection with a residential real estate transaction subject to this subsection (3), that person shall:

Within sixty days after closing, submit the appropriate form to the division with as much information as is available, and the division shall be responsible for obtaining the necessary well registration information directly from the buyer; and

Not be liable for delaying the closing of the transaction in order to ensure that the buyer completes the form required by subsection (3)(b)(I) of this section. If the closing is delayed pursuant to this subsection (3)(c)(I)(B), neither the buyer nor the seller shall have any claim under this section for relief against the buyer, the seller, the person who provided closing services, a title insurance company regulated pursuant to article 11 of title 10, or any person licensed pursuant to article 10 of title 12.

If no person provides such closing service, the buyer shall submit the appropriate form within the deadline specified in sub-subparagraph (A) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) and pay the applicable fee.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 298, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 669.

C.L.

§ 4870.

CSA:

C. 40, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-2.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 192, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2019:

(3)(b)(II) and (3)(c)(I)(B) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1722, § 231, effective October 1.

38-30-103.
Livery of seisin, not necessary.

Livery of seisin is in no case necessary for the conveyance of any lands, tenements, or hereditaments.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 106, § 2.

G.L.

§ 161.

G.S.

§ 199.

R.S. 08:

§ 670.

C.L.

§ 4871.

CSA:

C. 40, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-3.

38-30-104.
Vendor’s after-acquired title deemed in trust for vendee.

If any person sells and conveys to another by deed or conveyance, purporting to convey an estate in fee simple absolute, any tract of land or real estate lying and being in this state, not being possessed of the legal estate or interest therein at the time of the sale and conveyance and, after such sale and conveyance, the vendor becomes possessed of and confirmed in the legal estate of the land or real estate so sold and conveyed, it shall be taken and held to be in trust and for the use of the grantee or vendee, and said conveyance shall be held and taken, and shall be as valid as if the grantor or vendor had the legal estate or interest at the time of said sale or conveyance.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 106, § 4.

G.L.

§ 163.

G.S.

§ 201.

R.S. 08:

§ 672.

C.L.

§ 4873.

CSA:

C. 40, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-4.

38-30-104.5.
Grantor’s interest in vacated right-of-way deemed included.

Every conveyance or encumbrance of real property, voluntary or otherwise, including but not limited to any form of deed, lease, deed of trust, mortgage, or lien, is deemed to include the grantor’s interest, if any, in any vacated street, alley, or other right-of-way that adjoins the real property unless the interest is expressly excluded by the terms of the conveyance or encumbrance.

History.

Source:
L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-097), ch. 117, p. 416, § 2, effective August 9.

38-30-105.
Lands not in possession may be conveyed.

Any person claiming right or title to lands, tenements, or hereditaments, although he may be out of possession, and notwithstanding there may be an adverse possession thereof, may sell, convey, and transfer his interest in and to the same in as full and complete a manner as if he were in the actual possession of the lands and premises intended to be conveyed.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 107, § 5.

G.L.

§ 164.

G.S.

§ 202.

R.S. 08:

§ 673.

C.L.

§ 4874.

CSA:

C. 40, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-5.

38-30-106.
Tenant in fee tail takes in fee simple.

In cases where, by the common law, any person may be or become seized in fee tail of any lands, tenements, or hereditaments by virtue of any devise or conveyance, or by any other means whatsoever, such person, instead of becoming seized in fee tail thereof, shall be deemed and adjudged to be seized of such lands, tenements, and hereditaments in fee simple.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 107, § 6.

G.L.

§ 165.

G.S.

§ 203.

R.S. 08:

§ 674.

C.L.

§ 4875.

CSA:

C. 40, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-6.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1467, § 1, effective May 25.

38-30-107.
Estate granted deemed fee simple unless limited.

Every estate in land which is granted, conveyed, or devised to one, although other words necessary to transfer an estate of inheritance are not added, shall be deemed a fee simple estate of inheritance if a lesser estate is not limited by express words or does not appear to be granted, devised, or conveyed by operation of law.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 107, § 7.

G.L.

§ 166.

G.S.

§ 204.

R.S. 08:

§ 675.

C.L.

§ 4876.

CSA:

C. 40, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-7.

38-30-107.5.
Royalty interests - minerals or geothermal resources.

Any conveyance, reservation, or devise of a royalty interest in minerals or geothermal resources, whether of a perpetual or limited duration, contained in any instrument executed on or after July 1, 1991, creates a real property interest which vests in the holder or holders of such interest the right to receive the designated royalty share of the specified minerals or geothermal resources or the proceeds therefrom in accordance with the terms of the instrument. Unless otherwise provided in the conveyance, reservation, or devise, the holder of such interest shall not have the right to:

Explore for or develop the minerals or geothermal resources;

Grant a mineral development lease; or

Receive any share of rentals, bonus payments, surface damage payments, or similar sums that might be payable under the terms of any mineral development lease.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 1677, § 1, effective July 1.

38-30-108.
Conveyances to grantee in a representative capacity.

An instrument conveying an interest in real property, in which the grantee is described as trustee, agent, conservator, executor, administrator, attorney-in-fact, personal representative, nominee, custodian, or a person acting in any other representative capacity, shall also describe the representative capacity of such grantee by one or more of the following means:

Naming the person so represented;

Identifying the statute, the trust or other agreement, or the court appointment under which the grantee is acting; or

Referring, by proper description to book, page, document number, or file to an instrument, order, decree, or other writing containing any such description of the representative capacity of the grantee that is recorded with the county clerk and recorder in the county where the real property is located.

If the representative capacity of the grantee is not described as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the description of a grantee in any such representative capacity in such instrument of conveyance shall be presumed to be a description of the person only and shall not be notice of the representative capacity of such grantee.

After the recording of an instrument conveying an interest in real property in which the grantee is described as acting in a representative capacity, but in which the description of the grantee does not comply with subsection (1) of this section, and regardless of whether such instrument of conveyance was recorded prior to or after August 8, 2001, an affidavit that has been executed by or on behalf of such grantee, which refers by proper description by book, page, document number, or file to the recording information of such instrument of conveyance and that contains one of the descriptions of the representative capacity of such grantee described in subsection (1) of this section, may be recorded with the county clerk and recorder of the county where the real property is located. Upon the recording of such affidavit, all persons shall thereafter have notice of the representative capacity of such grantee with respect to the interest in real property so conveyed.

History.

Source:
L. 21:

P. 187, § 1.

C.L.

§ 4877.

CSA:

C. 40, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-8.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 398, § 1, effective August 8.

38-30-108.5.
Conveyances to trusts - ownership and transfer of property.

A trust may acquire, convey, encumber, lease, or otherwise deal with any interest in real or personal property in the name of the trust.

In order to evidence the existence of a trust and the authority of one or more trustees to act on behalf of the trust with respect to an interest in real property held in the name of the trust, any trustee of the trust may execute and record with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the real property is located, a statement of authority pursuant to section 38-30-172 (2).

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall also apply to any interest in real or personal property that is already in the name of the trust as of August 8, 2001. Nothing in this section shall be construed to be the exclusive manner in which title to an interest in real or personal property may be held by or on behalf of a trust, and title to an interest in real or personal property may be held by or on behalf of a trust in any other manner permitted by law.

History.

Source:
L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 399, § 2, effective August 8.

38-30-109.
Existing conveyances not notice of beneficiary unless statement filed in five years. (Repealed)

History.

Source:
L. 21:

P. 188, § 2.

C.L.

§ 4878.

CSA:

C. 40, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-9.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 628, § 37, effective August 4.

L. 2001:

Entire section repealed, p. 399, § 3, effective August 8.

38-30-110.
Rule against perpetuities inapplicable to cemetery trusts.

Any gifts, bequests, transfers, grants, or conveyances of real or personal property by any one person in trust amounting to not more than twenty-five thousand dollars in value in the aggregate at the time of the creation of such trusts, the income of which is to be used exclusively for the purpose of creating, maintaining, or caring for any graves, tombs, mausoleums, grave markers or monuments, burial places, grave sites, cemetery plots, or graveyards and payment of reasonable compensation to the trustee, shall be good, valid, and enforceable regardless of the time such trusts continue. The rule or law against perpetuities shall have no application to any such part of any such trusts as are not more than twenty-five thousand dollars in value at the time of the creation of such trusts.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to detract from the validity of any payment, gift, or bequest in consideration of an agreement of a cemetery relating to care and maintenance, or any trust or other agreement entered into by a cemetery in aid or furtherance of any promise of such cemetery relative to the maintenance thereof, or of any grave, tomb, mausoleum, grave marker or monument, burial place, grave site, or cemetery plot therein.

History.

Source:
L. 43:

P. 222, §§ 1, 2.

CSA:

C. 40, § 9(1).

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-10.

38-30-111.
Rule against perpetuities inapplicable to employees’ pension trusts.

No trust created by an employer as a part of a pension, stock bonus, disability, death benefit, or profit-sharing plan for the exclusive benefit of some or all of his employees or their beneficiaries, to which contributions are made by such employer or employees, or by both employer and employees, for the purpose of distributing to such employees or their beneficiaries the earnings or principal, or both earnings and principal, of such trust, is invalid by reason of any existing law or rule against perpetuities or accumulations or suspension of the power of alienation; but such trust may continue for such time as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes for which it may be created.

History.

Source:
L. 51:

P. 805, § 1.

CSA:

C. 40, § 9(2).

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-11.

38-30-112.
Rule against perpetuities inapplicable to existing trusts.

No suit or other proceeding affecting a pension, stock bonus, disability, death benefit, or profit-sharing plan existing on September 29, 1951, wherein relief is sought on the ground that such plan is in violation of any existing law or rule against perpetuities or accumulations or suspension of the power of alienation, shall be instituted.

History.

Source:
L. 51:

P. 805, § 2.

CSA:

C. 40, § 9(3).

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-12.

38-30-113.
Deeds - short form - acknowledgment - effect.

A deed for the conveyance of real property in substantially the following form and that includes the words “and warrant(s) the title to the same”, or substantially similar language, is a warranty deed with covenants of warranty:...................., whose street address is ........................, City or Town of ........................, County of ........................ and State of ........................, for the consideration of .............. dollars, in hand paid, hereby sell(s) and convey(s) to .................... whose street address is ...................., City or Town of ...................., County of .................... and State of ...................., the following real property in the County of ........................ and State of Colorado, to wit: ........................ with all its appurtenances and warrant(s) the title to the same, subject to ......................... . Signed this .................... day of ...................., 20..... ....................................

A deed for the conveyance of real property in substantially the following form and that includes the words “and warrant(s) the title to the same against all persons claiming under me”, or substantially similar language, is a special warranty deed with covenants of warranty as to the grantor’s period of ownership of the property:...................., whose street address is ........................, City or Town of ........................, County of ........................ and State of ........................, for the consideration of .............. dollars, in hand paid, hereby sell(s) and convey(s) to .................... whose street address is ...................., City or Town of ...................., County of .................... and State of ...................., the following real property in the County of ........................ and State of Colorado, to wit: ........................ with all its appurtenances and warrant(s) the title to the same against all persons claiming under me, subject to ......................... . Signed this .................... day of ...................., 20..... ....................................

A deed for the conveyance of real property in substantially the following form that does not include words of warranty has the same force and effect as a bargain and sale deed at common law, but without covenants of warranty, and passes the after-acquired title of the grantor:...................., whose street address is ........................, City or Town of ........................, County of ........................ and State of ........................, for the consideration of .............. dollars, in hand paid, hereby sell(s) and convey(s) to .................... whose street address is ...................., City or Town of ...................., County of .................... and State of ...................., the following real property in the County of ........................ and State of Colorado, to wit: ........................ with all its appurtenances ......................... . Signed this .................... day of ...................., 20..... ....................................

A deed for the conveyance of real property in substantially the following form that does not include words of warranty and with the word “quitclaim(s)” substituted for “convey(s)” is a quitclaim deed without covenants of warranty that passes no after-acquired title of the grantor:...................., whose street address is ........................, City or Town of ........................, County of ........................ and State of ........................, for the consideration of .............. dollars, in hand paid, hereby sell(s) and quitclaim(s) to .................... whose street address is ...................., City or Town of ...................., County of .................... and State of ...................., the following real property in the County of ........................ and State of Colorado, to wit: ........................ with all its appurtenances ......................... . Signed this .................... day of ...................., 20..... ....................................

Any deed described in subsection (1) of this section may be acknowledged in accordance with section 38-35-101 or 24-21-515. Failure to state the address or the county or state of residence of the grantor or grantee does not affect the validity of the deed.

Every deed in substance, in a form described in subsection (1) of this section or in any other form permitted by Colorado law, regardless of whether the deed recites valuable consideration or whether valuable consideration has been given for the deed, when properly executed, is a conveyance to the grantee, with covenants on the part of the grantor, if any, as set forth in subsection (4) of this section. Subject to any reservations specifically set forth in a deed, the form of deed used by the grantor does not affect the absolute nature of the fee simple conveyance of the property being conveyed and is not deemed to convey any lesser estate or interest simply by virtue of the form of deed used or whether the grantor provided any warranties of title in the deed.

The words “warrant(s) the title” in a warranty deed as described in subsection (1)(a) or (1)(b) of this section or in a mortgage as described in section 38-30-117 mean that the grantor covenants:

That, at the time of the making of the warranty deed, the grantor was lawfully seized of an indefeasible estate in fee simple in and to the property described in the deed and has good right and full power to convey the property;

That the property described in the deed was free and clear from all encumbrances, except as stated in the warranty deed; and

That the grantor warrants to the grantee and the grantee’s heirs and assigns the quiet and peaceable possession of the property and that:

With respect to a warranty deed or mortgage, the grantor will defend the title to the property against all persons who may claim the title; and

With respect to a special warranty deed, the grantor will defend the title to the property against all persons who may claim the title but only as against any persons claiming to hold title by, or through, the grantor.

A covenant described in subsection (4)(a) of this section is binding upon the grantor and the grantor’s heirs and personal representatives as fully as if it were written at length in the warranty deed.

A warranty deed or special warranty deed intended to include a limitation on the warranty of title pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section may use the words “subject to statutory exceptions” or include a different listing or description of exceptions as the grantor and grantee may agree. The words “statutory exceptions”, when used in any deed, mean that the grantee accepts title to the conveyed property subject to:

Real estate taxes for the calendar year in which the conveyance occurred and subsequent years that are not yet due and payable;

All matters that are disclosed or that would have been disclosed by an improvement survey plat, as defined in section 38-51-102 (9), of the conveyed property or could have been ascertained by an inspection of the conveyed property and which matters were not created or otherwise known by the grantor; and

All matters recorded in the real estate records of the county clerk and recorder for the county in which the conveyed property is located.

If a warranty deed or special warranty deed includes a blank after a reference to “statutory exceptions” but no additional matters are specifically listed in the blank, the blank is deemed to be deleted from the warranty deed or special warranty deed, and the title conveyed is subject only to the statutory exceptions.

History.

Source:
L. 17:

P. 158, § 1.

C.L.

§ 4879.

CSA:

C. 40, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-13.

L. 55:

P. 717, § 1.

L. 61:

P. 638, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-13.

L. 73:

P. 1152, § 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(d) added, p. 404, § 1, effective April 27.

L. 2017:

(1)(d) repealed, (SB 17-097), ch. 117, p. 416, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1098), ch. 18, p. 64, § 1, effective March 7.

38-30-113.5.
Beneficiary deeds.

Deeds intended to take effect at the death of the grantor may be executed and recorded pursuant to the provisions of part 4 of article 15 of title 15, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 734, § 4, effective August 4.

38-30-114.
Validation of acknowledgments.

Any deed or other conveyance of real property executed pursuant to section 38-30-113, if acknowledged in conformity with the provisions of section 38-35-101, shall be considered for all purposes as having been properly acknowledged. Such acknowledgment shall carry with it the presumption provided for by said section 38-35-101.

History.

Source:
L. 47:

P. 354, § 2.

CSA:

C. 40, § 11(1).

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-14.

38-30-115.
Deeds - bargain and sale - special warranty. (Repealed)

History.

Source:
L. 17:

P. 160, § 2.

C.L.

§ 4880.

CSA:

C. 40, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-15.

L. 2019:

Entire section repealed, (HB 19-1098), ch. 18, p. 68, § 4, effective March 7.

38-30-116.
Deeds - quitclaim. (Repealed)

History.

Source:
L. 17:

P. 160, § 3.

C.L.

§ 4881.

CSA:

C. 40, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-16.

L. 2019:

Entire section repealed, (HB 19-1098), ch. 18, p. 68, § 5, effective March 7.

38-30-116.5.
Preparation of deeds - definition.

In connection with the issuance of a policy of title insurance, but subject to the terms of this statute, a licensed title insurance entity may prepare deeds for the conveyance of real property in accordance with the forms described in section 38-30-113 (1).

A deed prepared by a licensed title insurance entity containing a covenant of warranty as provided in section 38-30-113 (1)(a) or (1)(b) must:

Include a limitation on the warranty of title pursuant to section 38-30-113 (4)(a); and

Use the words “subject to statutory exceptions” and no other terms or descriptions, unless the preparing licensed title insurance entity is otherwise instructed in writing by both:

The grantor or an authorized agent for the grantor; and

The grantee or an authorized agent for the grantee.

When preparing a deed pursuant to this section in which the phrase “subject to statutory exceptions” is used, a licensed title insurance entity shall not disclaim, limit, or seek indemnification against liability for any negligence by the licensed title insurance entity.

As used in this section, “licensed title insurance entity” means a title insurance entity, as defined in section 10-11-102 (11).

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1098), ch. 18, p. 67, § 2, effective March 7.

38-30-117.
Mortgages - short form - acknowledgment - effect.

A mortgage of real property may be substantially in the following form:.................., whose address is ........................, County of ........................ and State of ........................, hereby mortgage(s) to .................., whose address is ........................, County of ........................ and State of ........................, to secure the payment of .................. dollars due as follows: .................. the following described real property in the County of ........................ and State of Colorado, to wit: ........................ with all its appurtenances, and warrant(s) the title to the same, subject to .......................... .

[Form Excluded]

Such mortgage may be acknowledged in accordance with section 38-35-101. Failure to state the address or the county or state of residence of the grantor or grantee shall not affect the validity of such mortgage.

Every mortgage in substance in the above form, when properly executed, is a mortgage to secure the payment of the money specified in the mortgage, with covenants as expressed in section 38-30-113 (4)(a), but if the words “and warrant(s) the title to the same” are omitted, no such covenants are implied.

History.

Source:
L. 17:

P. 160, § 4.

C.L.

§ 4882.

CSA:

C. 40, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-17.

L. 55:

P. 718, § 2.

L. 61:

P. 639, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-17.

L. 2019:

(3) amended,(HB 19-1098), ch. 18, p. 68, § 3, effective March 7.

38-30-118.
Seal not necessary.

It is not necessary to the proper execution of any conveyance affecting real property that the same be executed under the seal of the grantor, nor that any seal or scroll or other mark be set opposite the name of the grantor.

History.

Source:
L. 17:

P. 161, § 5.

C.L.

§ 4883.

CSA:

C. 40, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-18.

38-30-119.
Posthumous children take as others.

When an estate has been limited by any conveyance, in remainder to the children of any person to be begotten, such children born after the decease of their parent shall take the estate in the same manner as if they had been born in the lifetime of the parent, though no estate has been conveyed to support the contingent remainder after his death.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 107, § 8.

G.L.

§ 167.

G.S.

§ 205.

R.S. 08:

§ 676.

C.L.

§ 4884.

CSA:

C. 40, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-19.

38-30-120.
Conveyance carries right of possession.

All conveyances of real estate and of any interest therein, duly executed and delivered, shall be held to carry with them the right to immediate possession of the premises or interest conveyed, unless a future day for the possession is therein specified.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 107, § 9.

G.L.

§ 168.

G.S.

§ 206.

R.S. 08:

§ 677.

C.L.

§ 4885.

CSA:

C. 40, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-20.

38-30-121.
What covenants run with the land.

Covenants of seisin, peaceable possession, freedom from encumbrances, and warranty contained in any conveyance of real estate, or any interest therein, shall run with the premises and inure to the benefit of all subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 107, § 10.

G.L.

§ 169.

G.S.

§ 207.

R.S. 08:

§ 678.

C.L.

§ 4886.

CSA:

C. 40, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-21.

38-30-122.
No action against warrantor without notice and refusal to defend.

No right of action shall exist upon a covenant of warranty against a warrantor when possession of the premises warranted has been actually delivered to or taken by the warrantee, until the party menacing the possession of the grantee, his heirs, personal representatives, or assigns have commenced legal proceedings to obtain possession of the premises in question and the grantor, after notice, has refused to defend, at his own cost, the premises in such action.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 108, § 11.

G.L.

§ 170.

G.S.

§ 208.

R.S. 08:

§ 679.

C.L.

§ 4887.

CSA:

C. 40, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-22.

38-30-123.
Powers of attorney must be recorded.

In order that all conveyances which are executed by any attorney-in-fact may be seen to be executed with the assent of the grantor, the power of attorney of the attorney-in-fact, duly proved or acknowledged, shall be recorded in the same office in which the conveyances themselves are required to be recorded.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 108, § 12.

G.L.

§ 171.

G.S.

§ 209.

R.S. 08:

§ 680.

C.L.

§ 4888.

CSA:

C. 40, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-23.

38-30-124.
Powers of attorney, how acknowledged and proved.

Powers of attorney for the conveying, leasing, or releasing of any lands, tenements, or hereditaments or any interest therein may be acknowledged or proved in the same manner as deeds.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 111, § 16.

G.L.

§ 175.

G.S.

§ 214.

R.S. 08:

§ 681.

C.L.

§ 4889.

CSA:

C. 40, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-24.

38-30-125.
Scroll sufficient.

Any instrument of writing to which the maker shall affix a scroll, by way of seal, shall be of the same effect and obligation to all intents as if the same were sealed.

History.

Source: L. 1879:

P. 170, § 1.

G.S.

§ 3121.

R.S. 08:

§ 683.

C.L.

§ 4890.

CSA:

C. 40, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-25.

38-30-126.
Acknowledgments, before whom taken.

Deeds, bonds, and agreements in writing conveying lands or any interest therein, or affecting title thereto, may be acknowledged or proved before the following officers when executed within this state:

Any judge of any court of record, the clerk of any such court of record, or the deputy of any such clerk, such judge, clerk, or deputy clerk certifying such acknowledgment under the seal of such court;

The clerk and recorder of any county, or his deputy, such clerk or deputy clerk certifying the same under the seal of such county;

Any notary public, certifying the same under his notarial seal; or

Prior to the second Tuesday in January, 1965, any justice of the peace within his county, except that if such deed, bond, or agreement is for the conveyance of lands situated beyond the county of such justice of the peace, there shall be affixed to his certificate of such acknowledgment a certificate of the county clerk and recorder of the proper county, under his hand and the seal of such county, as to the official capacity of such justice of the peace, and that the signature to such certificate of acknowledgment is the true signature of such justice.

When executed out of this state, and within the United States or any territory thereof, before:

The secretary of any such state or territory, certifying such acknowledgment under the seal of such state or territory;

The clerk of any court of record of such state or territory, or of the United States within such state or territory, having a seal, such clerk certifying the acknowledgment under the seal of such court;

Any notary public of such state or territory, certifying the same under his notarial seal;

Any commissioner of deeds for any such foreign state or territory appointed under the laws of this state, certifying such acknowledgment under his hand and official seal;

Any other officer authorized by the laws of any such state or territory to take and certify such acknowledgment if there is affixed to the certificate of such officer, other than those above enumerated, a certificate by the clerk of some court of record of the county, city, or district, wherein such officer resides, under the seal of such court, that the person certifying such acknowledgment is the officer he assumes to be, that he has the authority by the laws of such state or territory to take and certify such acknowledgment, and that the signature of such officer to the certificate of acknowledgment is the true signature of such officer.

When executed or acknowledged out of the United States, before:

Any judge, or clerk, or deputy clerk of any court of record of any foreign kingdom, empire, republic, state, principality, province, colony, island possession, or bailiwick, such judge, clerk, or deputy clerk certifying such acknowledgment under the seal of such court;

The chief magistrate or other chief executive officer of any province, colony, island possession, or bailiwick or the mayor or the chief executive officer of any city, town, borough, county, or municipal corporation having a seal, of such foreign kingdom, empire, republic, state, principality, province, colony, island possession, or bailiwick, such chief magistrate or other chief executive officer or such mayor certifying such acknowledgment under such seal; or

Any ambassador, minister, consul, vice-consul, consular agent, vice-consular agent, charge d’affaires, vice-charge d’affaires, commercial agent, vice-commercial agent, or diplomatic, consular, or commercial agent or representative or duly constituted deputy of any thereof of the United States or of any other government or country appointed to reside in the foreign country or place where the proof of acknowledgment is made, he certifying the same under the seal of his office.

When executed or acknowledged out of the state and within any colony, island possession, or bailiwick belonging to or under the control of the United States, before:

Any judge or clerk or deputy clerk of any court of record of such colony, island possession, or bailiwick, such judge, clerk, or deputy clerk certifying such acknowledgment under the seal of such court;

The chief magistrate or other chief executive officer of any such colony, island possession, or bailiwick, he certifying the same under his official seal, or before the mayor or the chief executive officer of any city, town, borough, county, or municipal corporation having a seal, of such colony, island possession, or bailiwick, such mayor or other chief officer certifying such acknowledgment under his official seal; or

Any notary public within such colony, island possession, or bailiwick, such notary public certifying such acknowledgment under his seal.

History.

Source: R.S.

P. 108, § 13.

G.L.

§ 172.

G.S.

§ 210.

L. 1887:

P. 229, § 1.

L. 1889:

P. 86, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 684.

L. 09:

P. 326, § 1.

C.L.

§ 4891.

CSA:

C. 40, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-26.

L. 64:

P. 307, § 269.

L. 76:

(3) R&RE, p. 314, § 69, effective May 20.

Editor’s note:

Justices of the peace were abolished pursuant to amendments to article VI of the constitution of the state of Colorado as adopted at the 1962 general election and S.B. No. 28, chapter 40, Session Laws of Colorado 1964.

38-30-127.
Acknowledgments taken pursuant to other laws.

In addition to the acknowledgment of instruments as provided by articles 30 to 44 of this title, instruments may be acknowledged by:

Members of the armed forces of the United States and certain other persons, as provided by section 24-12-104, C.R.S.;

Any person within or outside of this state, pursuant to part 5 of article 21 of title 24.

Any person otherwise authorized by law to take acknowledgments in this state may take and certify acknowledgments either in accordance with articles 30 to 44 of this title or in the same manner and on the same evidence as provided in part 5 of article 21 of title 24. Any certificate of acknowledgment that is taken pursuant to such part 2 shall be valid and have the benefits set forth in subsection (3) of this section, whether such certificate is given before or after January 1, 1999.

A certificate of acknowledgment taken pursuant to part 5 of article 21 of title 24, or taken pursuant to such part 2 and subsection (2) of this section shall:

Constitute prima facie evidence of proper execution of the instrument acknowledged;

Carry with it the presumptions provided by section 38-35-101; and

Be accorded the same force and effect as any acknowledgment taken and certified in accordance with articles 30 to 44 of this title.

History.

Source:
L. 43:

P. 217, § 1.

L. 47:

P. 356, § 4.

CSA:

C. 40, § 23A.

CRS 53:

§ 118-1-27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-1-27.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 744, § 7, effective January 1, 1999.

L. 2017:

(1)(b), (2), and IP(3) amended,(SB 17-132), ch. 207, p. 808, § 7, effective July 1, 2018.

Editor’s note:

(1) Section 8(2) of chapter 207 (SB 17-132), Session Laws of Colorado 2017, provides that the act changing this section applies to conduct occurring on or after July 1, 2018.

(2) The effective date for changes to this section by Senate Bill 17-132 was changed from August 9, 2017, to July 1, 2018, by section 121 of Senate Bill 17-294. (See

L

. 2017, p. 1418.)